District of Columbia statutes.
42-2203

Sources of monies for loans.

The fund shall consist of, but not be limited to, monies from the following sources:

(1)

Appropriations pursuant to this chapter;

(2)

Grants and gifts from public or private sources to the fund or to the District for the purposes of the fund;

(3)

Repayments on principal and any interest on loans provided from the fund;

(4)

Proceeds realized from the liquidation of any security interests held by the District under the terms of any assistance provided from the fund;

(5)

Interest earned from the deposit or investment of monies of the fund;

(6)

Monies appropriated for the fund by the United States government; and

(7)

All other revenues, receipts, and fees derived from the operation of the fund.

History

Mar. 24, 1988, D.C. Law 7-96, § 4, 35 DCR 891

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 45-3003.